Utah statutes.
32B-1-402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Authorized person" means a person authorized by law to sell or otherwise handle an alcoholic product.

(2)  "Restricted area" means a place where an alcoholic product is sold or consumed, but where under this title a minor is not permitted.

(3)  "Statement of age" means a statement signed under Section 32B-1-405 verifying the age of the person signing the statement.

